Utah statutes.
58-77-501.   Unlawful conduct.

(1)  In addition to the definition in Subsection 58-1-501(1), "unlawful conduct" includes:

(a)  representing or holding oneself out as a licensed Direct-entry midwife when not licensed under this chapter; and

(b)  using prescription medications, except oxygen, while engaged in the practice of Direct-entry midwifery when not licensed under this chapter.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (1)(a) and (b), it is lawful to practice Direct-entry midwifery in the state without being licensed under this chapter.

(b)  The practice of Direct-entry midwifery is not considered the practice of medicine, nursing, or nurse-midwifery.



Enacted by Chapter 299, 2005 General Session

